Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3303
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the License Suspension Act, the definitions found in sections 43-3304 to 43-3313 apply.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 28.